Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-305
Irregular tracts of land; survey; maps.

The board shall cause duplicate maps to be made, on which said tracts or lots of land shall be accurately described by lines and numbered from one up to the highest number of such tracts in each section, which numbers together with the number of the section, town and range, shall be distinctly marked. One of said maps shall be conspicuously hung in the office of the county clerk and the other in the office of the county treasurer.

Laws 1879, § 143, p. 390;

R.S.1913, § 1085;

C.S.1922, § 1010;

C.S.1929, § 26-702;

R.S.1943, § 23-305.